Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 10 Vital Records

Cross references.

Replacement of licenses, state identification cards, and other documents during periods of natural disaster, §

50-1-9

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2, effective November 1, 1982, rewrote this chapter, amending, renumbering, and repealing the Code sections therein. See the history lines to determine, where applicable, the former Code section numbers.

The former chapter consisted of Code Sections 31-10-1 through 31-10-75. Those Code sections which were repealed were based on Ga. L. 1914, p. 157, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1927, p. 353, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, §§ 16, 17; Ga. L. 1933, p. 7, § 1; Ga. L. 1945, p. 236, §§ 1, 5, 6; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 140, § 2; Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1 and Ga. L. 1981, p. 1456, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Vital records, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Public Health, Administration, Subject 511-1-3.

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 amendments to this chapter, see 8 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 81 (1992).

For note, “Big Brother is Watching:
When Should Georgia Get Involved in Issues of Family Privacy to Protect Children’s Liberties?,” see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 819 (2018).

31-10-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of public health.

“Dead body” means a human body or such parts of such human body from the condition of which it reasonably may be concluded that death recently occurred.

“Department” means the Department of Public Health.

“Fetal death” means death prior to the complete expulsion or extraction from its mother of a product of human conception, irrespective of the duration of pregnancy; the death is indicated by the fact that after such expulsion or extraction the fetus does not breathe or show any other evidence of life such as beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles.

“File” means the presentation of a vital record provided for in this chapter for registration by the State Office of Vital Records.

“Final disposition” means the burial, interment, cremation, removal from the state, or other authorized disposition of a dead body or fetus.

“Induced termination of pregnancy” means the purposeful interruption of pregnancy with the intention other than to produce a live-born infant or to remove a dead fetus and which does not result in a live birth.

“Institution” means any establishment, public or private, which provides in-patient or out-patient medical, surgical, or diagnostic care or treatment or nursing, custodial, or domiciliary care, or to which persons are committed by law.

“Live birth” means the complete expulsion or extraction from its mother of a product of human conception, irrespective of the duration of pregnancy, which, after such expulsion or extraction, breathes, or shows any other evidence of life such as beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles, whether or not the umbilical cord has been cut or the placenta is attached.

“Local custodian” means the person appointed by the state registrar to maintain and certify the local records of birth and death.

“Local registrar” means the person appointed by the state registrar to collect and transmit to the department certificates of birth, death, fetal death, and any other reports required by this chapter.

“Physician” means a person authorized or licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy pursuant to Chapter 34 of Title 43.

“Registration” means the acceptance by the State Office of Vital Records and the incorporation of vital records provided for in this chapter into the vital records registration system.

“Special abstracting agent” means the person appointed by the state registrar to examine and abstract evidence and submit such information to the department in order to file delayed certificates of birth or amend certificates of birth.

“Spontaneous fetal death” means the expulsion or extraction of a product of human conception resulting in other than a live birth and which is not an induced termination of pregnancy.

“State registrar” means the person responsible for the State Office of Vital Records and the state vital records registration system.

“Stillbirth” or “stillborn” means an unintended, intrauterine fetal death after a gestational age of not less than 20 completed weeks or of a fetus with a weight of 350 grams or more.

“Vital records” means certificates or reports of birth, death, marriage, divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment and data related thereto.

“Vital records registration system” means the registration, collection, preservation, amendment, and certification of vital records; the collection of other reports required by this chapter; and activities related thereto including the tabulation, analysis, and print or electronic publication of vital statistics.

“Vital statistics” means the data derived from certificates and reports of birth, death, spontaneous fetal death, induced termination of pregnancy, marriage, divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment and related reports.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 236, § 2; Ga. L. 1952, p. 208, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 140, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1702, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1701, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-2

; Code 1981, §

31-10-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 477, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 585, § 2/SB 381; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 1-4, 1-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 11/SB 388; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, §§ 6-3, 6-5/HB 214.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 585, § 1/SB 381, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘No Heartbeat Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-10-2.
Maintenance and operation of vital records registration system.

There is hereby established within the department the State Office of Vital Records which shall maintain and operate the state’s official vital records registration system. The system shall be in effect in all areas of the state, and the State Office of Vital Records shall provide for proper administration of the system and preservation of its records.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1702, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 477, § 2.

31-10-3.
Rules and regulations.

The department is authorized to adopt, amend, and repeal rules and regulations for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1703, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2.

31-10-4.
Appointment of state registrar of vital records.

The commissioner shall appoint the state registrar of vital records, hereinafter referred to as “state registrar,” subject to the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board, classified service.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1704, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-41/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

31-10-5.
Duties and powers of state registrar; delegation of functions and duties.

The state registrar shall:

Administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations issued under this chapter and issue instructions for the efficient administration of the State Office of Vital Records;

Direct and supervise the State Office of Vital Records and be custodian of its records;

Direct, supervise, and control the activities of all persons when they are engaged in activities pertaining to the operation of the State Office of Vital Records;

Conduct training programs to promote uniformity of policy and procedures throughout the state in matters pertaining to the State Office of Vital Records;

Prescribe, furnish, and distribute such forms as are required by this chapter and the rules and regulations issued under this chapter or prescribe such other means for transmission of data as will accomplish the purpose of complete and accurate reporting and registration;

Prepare and publish in print or electronically reports of vital statistics of this state and such other reports as may be required by the department; and

Provide to local health agencies copies of or data derived from certificates and reports required under this chapter, as the state registrar shall determine are necessary for local health planning and program activities. The state registrar shall establish a schedule with each local health agency for transmittal of the copies or data. The copies or data shall remain the property of the department, and the uses which may be made of them shall be governed by the state registrar.

The state registrar may establish or designate offices in the state to aid in the efficient administration of the State Office of Vital Records.

The state registrar may delegate such functions and duties vested in the state registrar to employees of the State Office of Vital Records and to employees of any office established or designated under subsection (b) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1703, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1705, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-3

; Code 1981, §

31-10-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Ga. L. 2004, p. 477, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

31-10-6.
Local registrars, local custodians, special abstracting agents, and deputies; appointment; duties.

The state registrar may appoint a local registrar and local custodian for each county and a special abstracting agent as necessary. Appointees must meet the qualifications and perform the duties required by this chapter and regulations of the department. The state registrar may appoint local deputy registrars as necessary. A local registrar, subject to the approval of the state registrar, may appoint a deputy or deputies. A local custodian, subject to the approval of the state registrar, may appoint a clerk or clerks of records.

Local registrars shall collect and receive vital records, review them for accuracy and completeness, and keep and submit other reports as may be required by the department.

Local custodians shall file, record, and preserve copies of vital records and issue certified copies provided for by law.

Special abstracting agents shall examine evidence, abstract evidence onto prescribed forms, and submit such completed forms to the State Office of Vital Records for the filing of delayed certificates of birth or the amendment of certificates of live birth.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 157, § 18; Ga. L. 1927, p. 353, § 18; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, §§ 16, 17; Ga. L. 1933, p. 7, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1210; Code 1933, § 88-1706, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-6

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 477, §§ 4, 11.

31-10-7.
Form of certificates and reports; date received for registration required; filing or registration of information by photographic, electronic, or other means.

In order to promote and maintain nation-wide uniformity in the system of vital records, the forms of certificates and reports required by this chapter, or by regulations adopted under this chapter, shall include as a minimum the items recommended by the federal agency responsible for national vital records and statistics.

Each certificate, report, and other document required by this chapter shall be on a form or in a format prescribed by the state registrar.

All vital records shall contain the date received for registration.

Information required in certificates or reports authorized by this chapter may be filed and registered by photographic, electronic, or other means as prescribed by the state registrar.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 157, § 17; Ga. L. 1927, p. 353, § 17; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, §§ 16, 17; Ga. L. 1933, p. 7, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1207; Code 1933, § 88-1708, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1707, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-8

; Code 1981, §

31-10-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31.

31-10-8.
Certification to county treasurers of birth and death certificates and spontaneous fetal death reports filed; fees.

The local registrar shall certify to the treasurer of the county each month the number of birth and death certificates and spontaneous fetal death reports filed with the State Office of Vital Records with respect to the treasurer’s county and the amount due. Upon certification, any fees due shall be paid by the county treasurer out of the general fund of the county.

Each local registrar shall receive from the county treasurer the sum of $2.00 for each complete certificate of birth, death, or spontaneous fetal death report which occurred in that local registrar’s county and is personally signed by that local registrar within the time prescribed by this chapter. A fee of 50¢ shall be paid for certificates or reports filed after the limits shown in this chapter except as noted by regulations adopted by the department.

The local custodian of vital records shall be paid a fee of $1.00 for each birth and death certificate properly recorded and indexed. Said fee shall be paid from county funds by the county treasurer.

Special abstractors shall be paid a fee of $2.00 for the complete filing of an abstract of evidence for a delayed certificate of birth or an amendment to a certificate of live birth which originates in the abstractor’s county. Said fee shall be paid from county funds by the county treasurer.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section, in counties where the local registrar or local custodian of vital records or special abstracting agent are employees of the county board of health, fees payable under this subsection shall be paid to the county health department monthly.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 157, § 19; Ga. L. 1927, p. 353, § 19; Code 1933, § 88-1211; Ga. L. 1945, p. 236, § 32; Code 1933, § 88-1707, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1179, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1708, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-7

; Code 1981, §

31-10-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 669, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section §

28-9-5

, in 2019, “State Office of Vital Records” was substituted for “state office of vital records” in subsection (a).

31-10-9.
Registration of births.

A certificate of birth for each live birth which occurs in this state shall be filed with the State Office of Vital Records within five days after such birth and filed in accordance with this Code section and regulations of the department.

When a birth occurs in an institution or en route thereto, the person in charge of such institution or that person’s designated representative shall obtain the personal data, prepare the birth certificate, certify, either by signature or by an electronic process established or approved by the State Office of Vital Records, that the child was born alive at the place and time and on the date stated and file the certificate with the State Office of Vital Records. The physician or other person in attendance shall provide the medical information required by the certificate within 72 hours after the birth occurs.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, when a birth occurs outside an institution, the certificate shall be prepared and filed by one of the following in the indicated order of priority:

The physician or certified nurse midwife in attendance at or immediately after the birth; or in the absence of such person:

Any other person in attendance at or immediately after the birth; or in the absence of such a person:

The father or the mother; or in the absence of the father and inability of the mother:

The person in charge of the premises where the birth occurred.

When a birth occurs on a moving conveyance within the United States and the child is first removed from the conveyance in this state, the birth shall be registered in this state and the place where it is first removed shall be considered the place of birth. When a birth occurs on a moving conveyance while in international waters or airspace or in a foreign country or its airspace and the child is first removed from the conveyance in this state, the birth shall be registered in this state but the certificate shall show the actual place of birth insofar as can be determined.

The name of the natural father or putative father shall be entered on the certificate of live birth as follows:

If the mother was married either at the time of conception or at the time of birth, the name of the husband shall be entered on the certificate as the father of the child unless paternity has been determined otherwise by a court having jurisdiction, in which case the name of the father as determined by the court shall be entered;

If the mother is not married at either the time of conception or at the time of birth, the name of the putative father shall not be entered on the certificate of birth without the written consent of the mother and the person to be named as father;

In any case in which paternity of a child is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, the name of the father and the surname of the child shall be entered on the certificate of birth in accordance with the finding and order of the court;

If the father is not named on the certificate of birth, no other information about the father shall be entered on the certificate; or

Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, in all other cases, the surname of the child shall be the legal surname of the mother at the time of the birth entered on the certificate as designated by the mother. When a paternity acknowledgment is completed, the surname of the child shall be entered as designated by both parents.

The birth certificate of a child born to a married woman as a result of artificial insemination, with consent of her husband, shall be completed in accordance with the provisions of subsection (e) of this Code section.

Either of the parents of the child, or other informant, shall verify the accuracy of the personal data entered on the certificate in time to permit the filing of the certificate within the time period prescribed in subsection (a) of this Code section.

All birth certificates filed and registered must identify the recorded person by name and the name of each legal parent of such person and the name of all other persons required by this Code section or by regulation. No obscenities, numbers, symbols, or other such nonidentifying name information will be accepted. If a legal parent has not decided upon a first or middle name for the child before the time limits established in this Code section, the birth record shall be registered without the child’s first or middle name, or both, unless a court order provides otherwise.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 157, §§ 12, 13; Ga. L. 1927, p. 353, §§ 12, 13; Code 1933, §§ 88-1201, 88-1202; Ga. L. 1945, p. 236, §§ 8, 11; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 140, § 4; Code 1933, § 88-1709, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-30

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 31; Ga. L. 1991, p. 669, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 477, § 5; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 31/HB 95.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on domestic relations, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 83 (2017).

31-10-9.1.
Social security account information of parents.

Social security account information of the mother and father, if paternity is acknowledged by the father, of a child born within this state shall be entered in the medical and health statistics section of the certificate of live birth at the time of filing the certificate of birth as provided in Code Section 31-10-9.

The state registrar shall make available the records of an individual’s name and social security number to the entity within the Department of Human Services authorized to enforce support orders for its use in the establishment of paternity or the enforcement of child support orders.

Information obtained pursuant to this Code section by the entity within the Department of Human Services authorized to enforce support orders may be used in an action or proceeding before any court, administrative tribunal, or other body for the purpose of establishing a child support obligation, collecting child support, or locating individuals owing the obligation.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-10-9.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1270, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1613, § 35; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2017, p. 646, § 2-4/SB 137.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “entity within” for “Child Support Enforcement Agency of” in subsections (b) and (c); in subsection (b), substituted “an individual’s” for “parent” near the beginning and inserted “authorized to enforce support orders” in the middle; and, in subsection (c),
inserted “pursuant to this Code section” in the beginning and substituted “authorized to enforce support orders” for “pursuant to this Code section” in the middle.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. L. Rev. 121 (1997).

31-10-9.2.
Abuse or neglect reports; establishment of policies and procedures.

The state registrar shall provide to the Division of Family and Children Services of the Department of Human Services copies of or data derived from certificates and reports filed with the state registrar upon notification by the Division of Family and Children Services of receipt of a report of abuse or neglect concerning a child or his or her parents or siblings pursuant to Code Section 19-7-5. Such reports or data shall include records related to birth or death, fetal death, and putative father registry of this state concerning a child or his or her parents or siblings.

The Department of Public Health, through the state registrar and the Division of Family and Children Services, shall jointly establish policies, procedures, and schedules regarding the transmittal of copies of records or data as jointly deemed necessary. The Department of Public Health and the Division of Family and Children Services shall enter into agreements as necessary to effectuate the provisions of this Code section and to ensure compliance with the requirements of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, as amended.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-10-9.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 181, § 5/HB 993.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2020.

U.S. Code.

The federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 1320

d et seq.

31-10-10.
Registration of live born infants of unknown parentage.

Whoever assumes the custody of a live born infant of unknown parentage shall report on a form and in a manner prescribed by the state registrar within ten days to the State Office of Vital Records the following information:

The date and place of finding;

Sex, color or race, and approximate birth date or age of child;

Name and address of the person or institution with whom the child has been placed for care;

Name given to the child by the custodian of the child; and

Other data required by the state registrar.

The place where the child was found shall be entered as the place of birth.

A report registered under this Code section shall constitute the certificate of birth for the child.

If the child is subsequently identified and a certificate of birth is found or obtained, the report registered under this Code section shall be placed in a special file and shall not be subject to inspection except upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction or as provided by regulation.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 236, § 13; Code 1933, § 88-1710, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1981, § 31-10-35; Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 477, § 11.

31-10-11.
Registration of delayed certificate of birth.

When a certificate of birth of a person born in this state has not been filed before that person’s first birthday, a delayed certificate of birth may be filed in accordance with regulations of the department. The certificate shall be registered subject to such evidentiary requirements as the department shall by regulation prescribe to substantiate the alleged facts of birth.

Delayed certificates of birth filed after the first birthday shall be made on forms prescribed by the state registrar, marked “Delayed,” and shall show on their face the date of the delayed registration.

A summary statement of the evidence submitted in support of the delayed registration shall be endorsed on the delayed certificate of birth.

When an applicant does not submit the minimum documentation required in the regulations for delayed registration or when the state registrar has reasonable cause to question the validity or adequacy of the applicant’s sworn statement or the documentary evidence, and if the deficiencies are not corrected, the state registrar shall not register the delayed certificate of birth and shall advise the applicant in writing of the reasons for this action and shall further advise the applicant of the applicant’s right of judicial appeal.

The department may by regulation provide for the dismissal of an application which is not actively prosecuted.

No delayed certificate of birth shall be registered for a deceased person.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1711, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1179, § 2; Code 1981, §

31-10-31

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 732, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 669, § 3.

31-10-12.
Judicial procedure to establish facts of birth.

If a delayed certificate of birth is rejected under the provisions of Code Section 31-10-11, a petition signed and sworn to by the petitioner may be filed in either the superior court or the probate court in the county of residence of the person for whom a delayed certificate of birth is sought for an order establishing a record of the date and place of the birth and the parentage of the person whose birth is to be registered and shall allege:

That the person for whom a delayed certificate of birth is sought was born in this state;

That no certificate of birth of such person can be found in the files of the State Office of Vital Records or the office of any local custodian of vital records;

That diligent efforts by the petitioner have failed to obtain the evidence required in accordance with Code Section 31-10-11 and regulations adopted pursuant thereto;

That the state registrar has refused to register a delayed certificate of birth; and

Such other allegations as may be required.

The petition shall be accompanied by a statement of the state registrar made in accordance with Code Section 31-10-11 and all documentary evidence which was submitted to the state registrar in support of such registration.

The superior court or probate court, as the case may be, shall fix a time and place for hearing the petition and shall give the state registrar not less than ten days’ notice of said hearing. The state registrar or his authorized representative may appear and testify in the proceeding.

If the superior court or probate court finds, from the evidence presented, that the person from whom a delayed certificate of birth is sought was born in this state, it shall make findings as to the place and date of birth, parentage, and such other findings as may be required and shall issue an order, on a form prescribed and furnished by the state registrar, to establish a delayed certificate of birth. This order shall include the birth data to be registered, a description of the evidence presented as prescribed by Code Section 31-10-11, and the date of the court’s action.

The clerk of superior court or the probate court, as the case may be, shall forward each such order to the state registrar not later than the tenth day of the calendar month following the month in which it was entered. Such order shall be registered by the state registrar and shall constitute the certificate of birth from which certified copies may be issued in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 424, §§ 1-7; Ga. L. 1949, p. 384, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 791, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 88-1712, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 31; Code 1981, §

31-10-32

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 477, § 11; Ga. L. 2008, p. 119, § 1/HB 111.

31-10-13.
Certificates of adoption.

For each adoption decreed by a court of competent jurisdiction in this state, the court shall require the preparation of a report of adoption on a form prescribed and furnished by the state registrar. The report shall include such facts as are necessary to locate and identify the original certificate of birth of the person adopted; shall provide information necessary to establish a new certificate of birth of the person adopted; and shall identify the order of adoption and be certified by the clerk of court.

Information necessary to prepare the report of adoption shall be furnished by the petitioner for adoption or the petitioner’s attorney. The appropriate agency or any person having knowledge of the facts shall supply the court with such additional information as may be necessary to complete the report. The provision of such information shall be prerequisite to the issuance of a final decree in the matter by the court.

Whenever an adoption decree is amended or annulled, the clerk of the court shall prepare a report thereof, which shall include such facts as are necessary to identify the original adoption report and the facts amended in the adoption decree as shall be necessary to amend the birth record properly.

Not later than the fifteenth day of each calendar month or more frequently, as directed by the state registrar, the clerk of the court shall forward to the state registrar reports of decrees of adoption, annulment of adoption, and amendments of decrees of adoption which were entered in the preceding month, together with such related reports as the state registrar shall require.

When the state registrar shall receive a certificate of adoption, report of annulment of adoption, or amendment of a decree of adoption of a person born outside this state, the state registrar shall forward such certificate or report to the state registrar in the indicated state of birth.

The following shall apply to certificates of birth of adopted persons born in a foreign country:

If a person was born in a foreign country, is not a citizen of the United States, and does not meet the requirements of the federal Child Citizenship Act of 2000, P.L. 106-395, 114 Stat. 1631, but was adopted through a court in this state, the state registrar shall prepare and register a certificate in this state. The certificate shall be established upon receipt of a report of adoption from the court decreeing the adoption and proof of the date and place of birth of the child. The certificate shall be labeled “Certificate of Foreign Birth” and shall show the actual country of birth. A statement shall also be included on the certificate indicating that it is not evidence of United States citizenship for the person for whom it is issued. After registration of the birth certificate in the new name of the adopted person, the state registrar shall seal and file the report of adoption which shall not be subject to inspection except upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction or as provided by statute;

If a person was born in a foreign country and was not a citizen of the United States at the time of birth but meets the requirements of the federal Child Citizenship Act of 2000, P.L. 106-395, 114 Stat. 1631, and was adopted through a court in this state, the state registrar shall prepare and register a certificate in this state. The certificate shall be established upon receipt of a report of adoption from the court decreeing the adoption and proof of the date and place of birth of the child. The certificate shall be labeled “Certificate of Foreign Birth” and shall show the actual country of birth. After registration of the birth certificate in the new name of the adopted person, the state registrar shall seal and file the report of adoption which shall not be subject to inspection except upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction or as provided by statute; and

If a person was born in a foreign country and was a citizen of the United States at the time of birth, the state registrar shall not prepare a “Certificate of Foreign Birth” and shall notify the adoptive parents of the procedure for obtaining a revised birth certificate for their child through the United States Department of State.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 236, § 10; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 140, § 3; Ga. L. 1955, p. 208, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 304, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 120, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1713, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 546, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 651, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-33

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 15; Code 1981, §

31-10-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1015, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 669, § 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2410, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 503, § 9.

Cross references.

Adoption, T. 19, C. 8.

Form of certificate of adoption, §

19-8-20

.

31-10-13.1.
Certified copies of orders and registration of legitimations and paternity orders.

For each legitimation, annulment of legitimation, and amendment of an order of legitimation decreed by a court of competent jurisdiction in this state, the clerk of the court shall not later than the fifteenth day of each calendar month or more frequently, as directed by the state registrar, forward to the state registrar a certified copy of each order of legitimation, annulment of legitimation, and amendment of an order of legitimation which was entered in the preceding month. Each order of legitimation, annulment of legitimation, and amendment of an order of legitimation shall comply with paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Code Section 31-10-23.

When the state registrar receives a certified copy of the order of legitimation, annulment of legitimation, or amendment of an order of legitimation of a person born outside this state, the state registrar shall forward such certified copy of the order to the state registrar in the indicated state of birth.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-10-13.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 915, § 1.

31-10-13.2.
Provision of copies of legitimation and paternity orders to state registrar.

In each case in which an order declaring paternity is entered by a court of competent jurisdiction in this state or by the Office of State Administrative Hearings, the clerk of the court or the Office of State Administrative Hearings shall not later than the fifteenth day of each calendar month or more frequently, as directed by the state registrar, forward to the state registrar a certified copy of each order of paternity, annulment of paternity, and amendment of an order of paternity which was entered in the preceding month. The order of paternity, annulment of paternity, and amendment of an order of paternity shall comply with paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Code Section 31-10-23.

When the state registrar receives a certified copy of an order of paternity, annulment of paternity, or amendment of an order of paternity of a person born outside this state, the state registrar shall forward such certified copy of the order to the state registrar in the indicated state of birth.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-10-13.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 915, § 2.